Alaska, session 34, HB19.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 15.10.120(c) is amended to read: 04 (c) An election supervisor shall appoint one nominee of the political party of 05 which the governor is a member [OR POLITICAL GROUP WITH THE LARGEST 06 NUMBER OF REGISTERED VOTERS AT THE TIME OF THE PRECEDING 07 GUBERNATORIAL ELECTION] and one nominee of the political party that 08 received [OR POLITICAL GROUP WITH] the second largest number of votes 09 statewide in [REGISTERED VOTERS AT THE TIME OF] the preceding 10 gubernatorial election. If [HOWEVER, THE ELECTION SUPERVISOR MAY 11 APPOINT A QUALIFIED PERSON REGISTERED AS A MEMBER OF A THIRD 12 POLITICAL PARTY OR POLITICAL GROUP OR AS A NONPARTISAN OR 13 UNDECLARED VOTER IF] a party district committee or state party central 14 committee of the party of which the governor is a member [OR GROUP WITH 15 THE LARGEST NUMBER OF REGISTERED VOTERS] or the party that received 01 [OR GROUP WITH] the second largest number of votes statewide in [REGISTERED 02 VOTERS AT THE TIME OF] the preceding gubernatorial election fails to present the 03 names prescribed by (b) of this section by April 15 of a regular election year or at least 04 60 days before a special [PRIMARY] election, the election supervisor may appoint 05 any qualified individual registered to vote. 06 * Sec. 2. AS 15.10.170 is amended to read: 07 Sec. 15.10.170. Appointment and privileges of watchers. (a) The precinct 08 party committee, where an organized precinct committee exists, or the party district 09 committee where no organized precinct committee exists, or the state party 10 chairperson where neither a precinct nor a party district committee exists, may appoint 11 one or more persons as watchers in each precinct and counting center for any election. 12 Each candidate not representing a political party may appoint one or more watchers 13 for each precinct or counting center in the candidate's respective district or the state for 14 any election. Any organization or organized group that sponsors or opposes an 15 initiative, referendum, or recall may have one or more persons as watchers at the polls 16 and counting centers after first obtaining authorization from the director. A state party 17 chairperson, a precinct party committee, a party district committee, or a candidate not 18 representing a political party or organization or organized group may not have 19 more than one watcher on duty at a time in any precinct or counting center. A watcher 20 must be a United States citizen. The watcher may be present at a position inside the 21 place of voting or counting that affords a full view of all action of the election officials 22 taken from the time the polls are opened until the ballots are finally counted and the 23 results certified by the election board or the data processing review board. The 24 election board or the data processing review board may require each watcher to 25 present written proof showing appointment by the precinct party committee, the party 26 district committee, the organization or organized group, or the candidate the watcher 27 represents that is signed by the chairperson of the precinct party committee, the 28 party district committee, the state party chairperson, the organization or 29 organized group, or the candidate representing no party. 30 (b) In addition to the watchers appointed under (a) of this section, in a primary 31 election, [OR] special [PRIMARY] election [OR SPECIAL ELECTION] under 01 AS 15.40.140, or special runoff election under AS 15.40.143, each candidate may 02 appoint one watcher in each precinct and counting center. 03 * Sec. 3. AS 15.13.020(b) is amended to read: 04 (b) The governor shall appoint two members of each of the two political 05 parties whose candidate for governor received the highest number of votes in [OR 06 POLITICAL GROUPS WITH THE LARGEST NUMBER OF REGISTERED 07 VOTERS AT THE TIME OF] the most recent preceding general election at which a 08 governor was elected. The two appointees from each of these two parties [OR 09 GROUPS] shall be chosen from a list of four names to be submitted by the central 10 committee of each party [OR GROUP]. 11 * Sec. 4. AS 15.13.020(d) is amended to read: 12 (d) Members of the commission serve staggered terms of five years, or until a 13 successor is appointed and qualifies. The terms of no two members who are members 14 of the same political party [OR POLITICAL GROUP] may expire in consecutive 15 years. A member may not serve more than one term. However, a person appointed to 16 fill the unexpired term of a predecessor may be appointed to a successive full five-year 17 term. 18 * Sec. 5. AS 15.13.074(c) is amended to read: 19 (c) A person or group may not make a contribution 20 (1) to a candidate or an individual who files with the commission the 21 document necessary to permit that individual to incur certain election-related expenses 22 as authorized by AS 15.13.100 when the office is to be filled at a general election 23 before the date that is 18 months before the general election; 24 (2) to a candidate or an individual who files with the commission the 25 document necessary to permit that individual to incur certain election-related expenses 26 as authorized by AS 15.13.100 for an office that is to be filled at a special election or 27 municipal election before the date that is 18 months before the date of the regular 28 municipal election or that is before the date of the proclamation of the special election 29 at which the candidate or individual seeks election to public office; or 30 (3) to any candidate later than the 45th day 31 (A) after the date of the primary [OR SPECIAL PRIMARY] 01 election if the candidate was on the ballot and was not nominated [CHOSEN 02 TO APPEAR ON THE GENERAL OR SPECIAL ELECTION BALLOT] at 03 the primary [OR SPECIAL PRIMARY] election; or 04 (B) after the date of the general [OR SPECIAL] election, or 05 after the date of a municipal or municipal runoff election. 06 * Sec. 6. AS 15.13.110(f) is amended to read: 07 (f) During the year in which the election is scheduled, each of the following 08 shall file the campaign disclosure reports in the manner and at the times required by 09 this section: 10 (1) a person who, under the regulations adopted by the commission to 11 implement AS 15.13.100, indicates an intention to become a candidate for elective 12 state executive or legislative office; 13 (2) a person who has filed a nominating petition under 14 AS 15.25.141 - 15.25.201 to become a candidate at the general election for elective 15 state executive or legislative office; 16 (3) a person who campaigns as a write-in candidate for elective state 17 executive or legislative office at the general election; and 18 (4) [(3)] a group or nongroup entity that receives contributions or 19 makes expenditures on behalf of or in opposition to a person described in (1) - (3) [(1) 20 OR (2)] of this subsection, except as provided for certain independent expenditures by 21 nongroup entities in AS 15.13.135(a). 22 * Sec. 7. AS 15.13.110(j) is amended to read: 23 (j) Before the primary election, a candidate seeking nomination by petition 24 under AS 15.25.141 - 15.25.201 [AS 15.25.140 - 15.25.200] for the office of 25 governor, lieutenant governor, state senator, or state representative shall file the 26 reports under (a)(1) and (2) of this section. 27 * Sec. 8. AS 15.13.400(4) is amended to read: 28 (4) "contribution" 29 (A) means a purchase, payment, promise or obligation to pay, 30 loan or loan guarantee, deposit or gift of money, goods, or services for which 31 charge is ordinarily made, and includes the payment by a person other than a 01 candidate or political party, or compensation for the personal services of 02 another person, that is rendered to the candidate or political party, and that is 03 made for the purpose of 04 (i) influencing the nomination or election of a 05 candidate; 06 (ii) influencing a ballot proposition or question; or 07 (iii) supporting or opposing an initiative proposal 08 application filed with the lieutenant governor under AS 15.45.020; 09 (B) does not include 10 (i) services provided without compensation by 11 individuals volunteering a portion or all of their time on behalf of a 12 political party, candidate, or ballot proposition or question; 13 (ii) ordinary hospitality in a home; 14 (iii) two or fewer mass mailings before each election by 15 each political party describing the party's slate of candidates for 16 [MEMBERS OF THE PARTY RUNNING AS CANDIDATES FOR 17 PUBLIC OFFICE IN THAT] election, which may include photographs, 18 biographies, and information about the party's candidates; 19 (iv) the results of a poll limited to issues and not 20 mentioning any candidate, unless the poll was requested by or designed 21 primarily to benefit the candidate; 22 (v) any communication in the form of a newsletter from 23 a legislator to the legislator's constituents, except a communication 24 expressly advocating the election or defeat of a candidate or a 25 newsletter or material in a newsletter that is clearly only for the private 26 benefit of a legislator or a legislative employee; 27 (vi) a fundraising list provided without compensation 28 by one candidate or political party to a candidate or political party; or 29 (vii) an opportunity to participate in a candidate forum 30 provided to a candidate without compensation to the candidate by 31 another person and for which a candidate is not ordinarily charged; 01 * Sec. 9. AS 15.15.030(5) is amended to read: 02 (5) The names of the candidates and their party designations shall be 03 placed in separate sections on the state general election ballot under the office 04 designation to which they were nominated. The [IF A CANDIDATE IS 05 REGISTERED AS AFFILIATED WITH A POLITICAL PARTY OR POLITICAL 06 GROUP, THE] party affiliation, if any, shall [MAY] be designated after the name of 07 the candidate [, UPON REQUEST OF THE CANDIDATE. IF A CANDIDATE HAS 08 REQUESTED DESIGNATION AS NONPARTISAN OR UNDECLARED, THAT 09 DESIGNATION SHALL BE PLACED AFTER THE NAME OF THE CANDIDATE. 10 IF A CANDIDATE IS NOT REGISTERED AS AFFILIATED WITH A POLITICAL 11 PARTY OR POLITICAL GROUP AND HAS NOT REQUESTED TO BE 12 DESIGNATED AS NONPARTISAN OR UNDECLARED, THE CANDIDATE 13 SHALL BE DESIGNATED AS UNDECLARED]. The lieutenant governor and the 14 governor shall be included under the same section. Provision shall be made for voting 15 for write-in and no-party candidates within each section. Paper ballots for the state 16 general election shall be printed on white paper. 17 * Sec. 10. AS 15.15.360(a) is amended to read: 18 (a) The election board shall count ballots according to the following rules: 19 (1) A voter may mark a ballot only by filling in, making "X" marks, 20 diagonal, horizontal, or vertical marks, solid marks, stars, circles, asterisks, checks, or 21 plus signs that are clearly spaced in the oval opposite the name of the candidate, 22 proposition, or question that the voter desires to designate. [IN A GENERAL 23 ELECTION, A VOTER MAY MARK A BALLOT THAT REQUIRES THE VOTER 24 TO VOTE FOR CANDIDATES IN ORDER OF RANKED PREFERENCE BY THE 25 USE OF NUMERALS THAT ARE CLEARLY SPACED IN ONE OF THE OVALS 26 OPPOSITE THE NAME OF THE CANDIDATE THAT THE VOTER DESIRES TO 27 DESIGNATE.] 28 (2) A failure to properly mark a ballot as to one or more candidates 29 does not itself invalidate the entire ballot. 30 (3) If a voter marks fewer names than there are persons to be 31 elected to the office, a vote shall be counted for each candidate properly marked. 01 (4) If a voter marks more names than there are persons to be elected to 02 the office, the votes for candidates for that office may not be counted. 03 (5) [(4)] The mark specified in (1) of this subsection shall be counted 04 only if it is substantially inside the oval provided, or touching the oval so as to indicate 05 clearly that the voter intended the particular oval to be designated. 06 (6) [(5)] Improper marks on the ballot may not be counted and do not 07 invalidate marks for candidates properly made. 08 (7) [(6)] An erasure or correction invalidates only that section of the 09 ballot in which it appears. 10 (8) [(7)] A vote marked for the candidate for President or Vice- 11 President of the United States is considered and counted as a vote for the election of 12 the presidential electors. 13 [(9) REPEALED 14 (10) REPEALED 15 (11) REPEALED 16 (12) REPEALED] 17 * Sec. 11. AS 15.15.370 is amended to read: 18 Sec. 15.15.370. Completion of ballot count; certificate. When the count of 19 ballots is completed, and in no event later than the day after the election, the election 20 board shall make a certificate in duplicate of the results. The certificate includes the 21 number of votes cast for each candidate, [INCLUDING, FOR A CANDIDATE IN A 22 GENERAL ELECTION, THE NUMBER OF VOTES AT EACH ROUND OF THE 23 RANKED-CHOICE TABULATION PROCESS UNDER AS 15.15.350, THE 24 NUMBER OF VOTES] for and against each proposition, yes or no on each question, 25 and any additional information prescribed by the director. The election board shall, 26 immediately upon completion of the certificate or as soon thereafter as the local mail 27 service permits, send in one sealed package to the director one copy of the certificate 28 and the register. In addition, all ballots properly cast shall be mailed to the director in a 29 separate, sealed package. Both packages, in addition to an address on the outside, shall 30 clearly indicate the precinct from which they come. Each board shall, immediately 31 upon completion of the certification and as soon thereafter as the local mail service 01 permits, send the duplicate certificate to the respective election supervisor. The 02 director may authorize election boards in precincts in those areas of the state where 03 distance and weather make mail communication unreliable to forward their election 04 results by telephone or radio. The director may authorize the unofficial totaling of 05 votes on a regional basis by election supervisors, tallying the votes as indicated on 06 duplicate certificates. To ensure adequate protection, the director shall prescribe the 07 manner in which the ballots, registers, and all other election records and materials are 08 thereafter preserved, transferred, and destroyed. 09 * Sec. 12. AS 15.15.450 is amended to read: 10 Sec. 15.15.450. Certification of state ballot counting review. Upon 11 completion of the state ballot counting review, the director shall certify the person 12 receiving the largest number of votes for the office for which that person was a 13 candidate as elected to that office [NOMINATED OR ELECTED, AS 14 APPLICABLE,] and shall certify the approval of a justice or judge not rejected by a 15 majority of the voters voting on the question. The director shall issue to the elected 16 candidates and approved justices and judges a certificate of their election or approval. 17 The director shall also certify the results of a proposition and other question except 18 that the lieutenant governor shall certify the results of an initiative, referendum, or 19 constitutional amendment. 20 * Sec. 13. AS 15.20.081(a) is amended to read: 21 (a) A qualified voter may apply in person, by mail, or by facsimile, scanning, 22 or other electronic transmission to the director for an absentee ballot under this 23 section. Another individual may apply for an absentee ballot on behalf of a qualified 24 voter if that individual is designated to act on behalf of the voter in a written general 25 power of attorney or a written special power of attorney that authorizes the other 26 individual to apply for an absentee ballot on behalf of the voter. The application must 27 include the address or, if the application requests delivery of an absentee ballot by 28 electronic transmission, the telephone electronic transmission number, to which the 29 absentee ballot is to be returned, the applicant's full Alaska residence address, and the 30 applicant's signature. However, a person residing outside the United States and 31 applying to vote absentee in federal elections in accordance with AS 15.05.011 need 01 not include an Alaska residence address in the application. A person may supply to a 02 voter an absentee ballot application form with a political party or group affiliation 03 indicated only if the voter is already registered as affiliated with the political party or 04 group indicated. Only the voter or the individual designated by the voter in a 05 written power of attorney under this subsection may mark the voter's choice of 06 primary ballot on an application. A person supplying an absentee ballot 07 application form may not design or mark the application in a manner that 08 suggests choice of one ballot over another, except that ballot choices may be listed 09 on an application as authorized by the division. The application must be made on a 10 form prescribed or approved by the director. The voter or registration official shall 11 submit the application directly to the division of elections. For purposes of this 12 subsection, "directly to the division of elections" means that an application may not be 13 submitted to any intermediary that could control or delay the submission of the 14 application to the division or gather data on the applicant from the application form. 15 However, nothing in this subsection is intended to prohibit a voter from giving a 16 completed absentee ballot application to a friend, relative, or associate for transfer to 17 the United States Postal Service or a private commercial delivery service for delivery 18 to the division. 19 * Sec. 14. AS 15.20.081(h) is amended to read: 20 (h) Except as provided in AS 15.20.480, an absentee ballot returned by mail 21 from outside the United States or from an overseas voter qualifying under 22 AS 15.05.011 that has been marked and mailed not later than election day may not be 23 counted unless the ballot is received by the election supervisor not later than the close 24 of business on the 25 (1) 10th day following a primary election or special [PRIMARY] 26 election under AS 15.40.140; or 27 (2) 15th day following a general election, special runoff election, or 28 special election, other than a special [PRIMARY] election described in (1) of this 29 subsection. 30 * Sec. 15. AS 15.20.190(a) is amended to read: 31 (a) Thirty days before the date of an election, the election supervisors shall 01 appoint, in the same manner provided for the appointment of election officials 02 prescribed in AS 15.10, district absentee ballot counting boards and district questioned 03 ballot counting boards, each composed of at least four members. At least one member 04 of each board must be a member of the same political party of which the governor is 05 a member [OR POLITICAL GROUP WITH THE LARGEST NUMBER OF 06 REGISTERED VOTERS AT THE TIME OF THE PRECEDING 07 GUBERNATORIAL ELECTION], and at least one member of each board must be a 08 member of the political party whose candidate for governor received the second 09 largest number of votes in [OR POLITICAL GROUP WITH THE SECOND 10 LARGEST NUMBER OF REGISTERED VOTERS AT THE TIME OF] the 11 preceding gubernatorial election. The district boards shall assist the election 12 supervisors in counting the absentee and questioned ballots and shall receive the same 13 compensation paid election officials under AS 15.15.380. 14 * Sec. 16. AS 15.20.203(i) is amended to read: 15 (i) The director shall mail the materials described in (h) of this section to the 16 voter not later than 17 (1) 10 days after completion of the review of ballots by the state 18 review board for a primary election or for a special [PRIMARY] election under 19 AS 15.40.140 that is followed by a special runoff election; 20 (2) 60 days after certification of the results of a general election, 21 special runoff election, or special election other than a special [PRIMARY] election 22 described in (1) of this subsection. 23 * Sec. 17. AS 15.20.203(j) is amended to read: 24 (j) The director shall make available through a free access system to each 25 absentee voter a system to check to see whether the voter's ballot was counted and, if 26 not counted, the reason why the ballot was not counted. The director shall make this 27 information available through the free access system not less than 28 (1) 10 days after certification of the results of a primary election, or a 29 special [PRIMARY] election under AS 15.40.140 that is followed by a special 30 runoff election; and 31 (2) 30 days after certification of the results of a general or special 01 election, other than a special [PRIMARY] election described in (1) of this subsection. 02 * Sec. 18. AS 15.20.207(i) is amended to read: 03 (i) The director shall mail the materials described in (h) of this section to the 04 voter not later than 05 (1) 10 days after completion of the review of ballots by the state 06 review board for a primary election or for a special [PRIMARY] election under 07 AS 15.40.140 that is followed by a special runoff election; 08 (2) 60 days after certification of the results of a general or special 09 election, other than a special [PRIMARY] election described in (1) of this subsection. 10 * Sec. 19. AS 15.20.207(k) is amended to read: 11 (k) The director shall make available through a free access system to each 12 voter voting a questioned ballot a system to check to see whether the voter's ballot was 13 counted and, if not counted, the reason why the ballot was not counted. The director 14 shall make this information available through the free access system not less than 15 (1) 10 days after the certification of the results of a primary election or 16 a special [PRIMARY] election under AS 15.40.140 that is followed by a special 17 runoff election; and 18 (2) 30 days after certification of the results of a general or special 19 election, other than a special [PRIMARY] election described in (1) of this subsection. 20 * Sec. 20. AS 15.20.211(d) is amended to read: 21 (d) The director shall mail the materials described in (c) of this section to the 22 voter not later than 23 (1) 10 days after completion of the review of ballots by the state 24 review board for a primary, election or for a special [PRIMARY] election under 25 AS 15.40.140 that is followed by a special runoff election; 26 (2) 60 days after certification of the results of a general or special 27 election, other than a special [PRIMARY] election described in (1) of this subsection. 28 * Sec. 21. AS 15.20.211(f) is amended to read: 29 (f) The director shall make available through a free access system to each 30 voter whose ballot was subject to partial counting under this section a system to check 31 to see whether the voter's ballot was partially counted and, if not counted, the reason 01 why the ballot was not counted. The director shall make this information available 02 through the free access system not less than 03 (1) 10 days after certification of the results of a primary election or a 04 special [PRIMARY] election under AS 15.40.140 that is followed by a special 05 runoff election; and 06 (2) 30 days after the certification of the results of a general or special 07 election, other than a special [PRIMARY] election described in (1) of this subsection. 08 * Sec. 22. AS 15.25.010 is amended to read: 09 Sec. 15.25.010. Provision for primary election. Candidates for the elective 10 state executive and state and national legislative offices shall be nominated in a 11 primary election by direct vote of the people in the manner prescribed by this chapter. 12 Unless two or more political parties have jointly requested a combined primary 13 election ballot, the director shall prepare and provide a primary election ballot 14 for each political party. The director shall prepare and provide a combined 15 primary election ballot for two or more parties that have jointly requested a 16 combined primary election ballot. A voter registered as affiliated with a political 17 party may vote that party's ballot, or, a combined primary election ballot if the 18 party's candidates are listed on the combined primary election ballot. A voter 19 registered as nonpartisan or undeclared rather than as affiliated with a 20 particular political party may vote the political party ballot or combined primary 21 election ballot of the voter's choice unless prohibited from doing so under 22 AS 15.25.015. A voter registered as affiliated with a political party may not vote 23 the ballot of a different political party or a combined primary election ballot that 24 only includes candidates of political parties other than the party the voter is 25 registered as affiliated with unless permitted to do so under AS 15.25.015 [THE 26 PRIMARY ELECTION DOES NOT SERVE TO DETERMINE THE NOMINEE OF 27 A POLITICAL PARTY OR POLITICAL GROUP BUT SERVES ONLY TO 28 NARROW THE NUMBER OF CANDIDATES WHOSE NAMES WILL APPEAR 29 ON THE BALLOT AT THE GENERAL ELECTION. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN 30 AS 15.25.100(d), ONLY THE FOUR CANDIDATES WHO RECEIVE THE 31 GREATEST NUMBER OF VOTES FOR ANY OFFICE SHALL ADVANCE TO 01 THE GENERAL ELECTION]. 02 * Sec. 23. AS 15.25 is amended by adding a new section to read: 03 Sec. 15.25.015. Participation in primary election selection of a political 04 party's candidates. (a) Not later than 5:00 p.m., Alaska time, on September 1 of the 05 calendar year before the calendar year in which a primary election is to be held, a 06 political party shall submit a notice in writing to the director stating whether the party 07 bylaws expand or limit who may participate in the primary election for selection of the 08 party's candidates for elective state executive and state and national legislative offices 09 and whether the party requests a combined primary election ballot. If the party 10 requests a combined primary election ballot, the party shall request the combined 11 primary election ballot jointly with the other parties requesting the combined primary 12 election ballot. A copy of the party's bylaws expanding or limiting who may 13 participate in the primary election for selection of the party's candidates, 14 documentation required under (b) of this section, and other information required by 15 the director, must be submitted along with the notice. The notice, bylaws, 16 documentation, and other information required by the director shall be provided by the 17 party's chairperson or another party official designated by the party's bylaws. 18 (b) Once a political party timely submits a notice and bylaws under (a) of this 19 section and the director finds that the party has met the requirements of this chapter 20 and other applicable laws, the director shall permit a voter registered as affiliated with 21 another party to vote the party's ballot or a combined primary election ballot that 22 includes the party's candidates if the voter is permitted by the party's bylaws to 23 participate in the selection of the party's candidates and may not permit a voter 24 registered as nonpartisan or undeclared to vote a party's ballot or a combined primary 25 election ballot that includes the party's candidates if the party's bylaws restrict 26 participation by nonpartisan or undeclared voters in the party's primary; however, for a 27 subsequent primary election, the party shall timely submit another notice, bylaws, 28 documentation, and other information under (a) of this section if the party's bylaws 29 regarding who may participate in the primary election for selection of the party's 30 candidates change. 31 * Sec. 24. AS 15.25.030(a) is amended to read: 01 (a) A member of a political party [PERSON] who seeks to become a 02 candidate of the party in the primary election [OR A SPECIAL PRIMARY 03 ELECTION] shall execute and file a declaration of candidacy. The declaration shall be 04 executed under oath before an officer authorized to take acknowledgments and must 05 state in substance 06 (1) the full name of the candidate; 07 (2) the full mailing address of the candidate; 08 (3) if the candidacy is for the office of state senator or state 09 representative, the house or senate district of which the candidate is a resident; 10 (4) the office for which the candidate seeks nomination; 11 (5) the name of the political party of which the person is a candidate 12 for nomination [OR POLITICAL GROUP WITH WHICH THE CANDIDATE IS 13 REGISTERED AS AFFILIATED, OR WHETHER THE CANDIDATE WOULD 14 PREFER A NONPARTISAN OR UNDECLARED DESIGNATION PLACED 15 AFTER THE CANDIDATE'S NAME ON THE BALLOT]; 16 (6) the full residence address of the candidate, and the date on which 17 residency at that address began; 18 (7) the date of the primary election [OR SPECIAL PRIMARY 19 ELECTION] at which the candidate seeks nomination; 20 (8) the length of residency in the state and in the district of the 21 candidate; 22 (9) that the candidate will meet the specific citizenship requirements of 23 the office for which the person is a candidate; 24 (10) that the candidate is a qualified voter as required by law; 25 (11) that the candidate will meet the specific age requirements of the 26 office for which the person is a candidate; if the candidacy is for the office of state 27 representative, that the candidate will be at least 21 years of age on the first scheduled 28 day of the first regular session of the legislature convened after the election; if the 29 candidacy is for the office of state senator, that the candidate will be at least 25 years 30 of age on the first scheduled day of the first regular session of the legislature convened 31 after the election; if the candidacy is for the office of governor or lieutenant governor, 01 that the candidate will be at least 30 years of age on the first Monday in December 02 following election or, if the office is to be filled by special election under 03 AS 15.40.230 - 15.40.310, that the candidate will be at least 30 years of age on the 04 date of certification of the results of the special election; or, for any other office, by 05 the time that the candidate, if elected, is sworn into office; 06 (12) that the candidate requests that the candidate's name be placed on 07 the primary [ELECTION OR SPECIAL PRIMARY] election ballot; 08 (13) that the required fee accompanies the declaration; 09 (14) that the person is not a candidate for any other office to be voted 10 on at the primary or general election and that the person is not a candidate for this 11 office under any other declaration of candidacy or nominating petition; and 12 (15) the manner in which the candidate wishes the candidate's name to 13 appear on the ballot [; 14 (16) IF THE CANDIDACY IS FOR THE OFFICE OF THE 15 GOVERNOR, THE NAME OF THE CANDIDATE FOR LIEUTENANT 16 GOVERNOR RUNNING JOINTLY WITH THE CANDIDATE FOR GOVERNOR; 17 AND 18 (17) IF THE CANDIDACY IS FOR THE OFFICE OF LIEUTENANT 19 GOVERNOR, THE NAME OF THE CANDIDATE FOR GOVERNOR RUNNING 20 JOINTLY WITH THE CANDIDATE FOR LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR]. 21 * Sec. 25. AS 15.25 is amended by adding a new section to read: 22 Sec. 15.25.057. Nomination by party petition where incumbent dies or is 23 disqualified or incapacitated. (a) If an unopposed incumbent candidate for 24 renomination dies, becomes disqualified from holding the office the candidate is 25 seeking, or is certified as being incapacitated between June 1 of the election year and 26 that date which is more than 54 days before the date of the primary election, the 27 candidate's place on the ballot may be filled by party petition. The petition shall state 28 that the political party requests the name of the proposed candidate replace that of the 29 incumbent on the primary election ballot and shall be accompanied by a declaration of 30 candidacy from the person named in the petition. The petition must be received by the 31 director not later than 14 days after the death, disqualification, or certification of 01 incapacity of the incumbent or 52 days before the primary election date, whichever 02 time is earlier. 03 (b) The method for certifying an incumbent candidate for nomination as being 04 incapacitated, the method for selecting the person who is to be named in the party 05 petition, and the method for placing the name of the person selected on the primary 06 nomination ballot are the same as those prescribed in AS 15.25.111 and 15.25.131 07 relating to filling vacancies of party nominees in a general election. 08 (c) The death, disqualification, or certification of incapacity of the incumbent 09 within 52 days before or on the primary election date does not affect the counting and 10 review of the ballots. If the result of the counting and review discloses that the 11 candidate, if the candidate had lived, would have been nominated, the candidate shall 12 be declared nominated. The vacancy may be filled by party petition as provided in 13 AS 15.25.111 - 15.25.131. 14 * Sec. 26. AS 15.25.060 is repealed and reenacted to read: 15 Sec. 15.25.060. Preparation and distribution of ballots; appropriate ballot. 16 (a) The primary election ballots shall be prepared and distributed by the director in the 17 manner prescribed in this section. Unless two or more political parties have jointly 18 requested a combined primary election ballot, the director shall prepare and provide a 19 primary election ballot for each political party that contains all of the candidates of 20 that party for elective state executive and state and national legislative offices and all 21 of the ballot titles and propositions required to appear on the ballot at the primary 22 election. Upon the joint request of two or more political parties, the director shall 23 prepare and provide a combined primary election ballot for those parties that contains 24 all of the candidates of the parties for elective state executive and state and national 25 legislative offices and all of the ballot titles and propositions required to appear on the 26 ballot at the primary election. The director shall print the ballots on white paper and 27 place the names of all candidates who have properly filed in groups according to 28 offices. The order of the placement of the names for each office shall be as provided 29 for the general election ballot. Blank spaces may not be provided on the ballot for the 30 writing or pasting in of names. The director shall also prepare and print a separate 31 primary election ballot including only the ballot titles and propositions required to 01 appear on the ballot. 02 (b) A voter may vote only one primary election ballot. A voter may vote a 03 political party ballot only if the voter is registered as affiliated with that party, is 04 allowed to participate in the party primary under the party's bylaws, or is registered as 05 nonpartisan or undeclared rather than as affiliated with a particular political party and 06 the party's bylaws do not restrict participation by nonpartisan or undeclared voters in 07 the party's primary. A voter may vote a combined primary election ballot only if the 08 voter is registered as affiliated with a party appearing on the ballot, is allowed to 09 participate in the party primary under the parties' bylaws, or is registered as 10 nonpartisan or undeclared rather than as affiliated with a particular political party and 11 the parties' bylaws do not restrict participation by nonpartisan or undeclared voters in 12 the parties' primaries. For the purpose of determining which primary election ballot a 13 voter may use, a voter's party affiliation is considered to be the affiliation registered 14 with the director as of the 30th day before the primary election. If a voter changes 15 party affiliation within the 30 days before the primary election, the voter's previous 16 party affiliation shall be used for the determination under this subsection. 17 (c) If a voter is not voting in person and has requested an absentee ballot or 18 special needs ballot but has not indicated a choice of ballot, the director shall provide 19 the voter with the ballot listing the candidates of the political party or group with 20 which the voter is affiliated, as determined under (b) of this section. 21 * Sec. 27. AS 15.25.100 is repealed and reenacted to read: 22 Sec. 15.25.100. Placement of nominees on general election ballot. The 23 director shall place the name of the candidate receiving the highest number of votes 24 for an office by a political party on the general election ballot. 25 * Sec. 28. AS 15.25.105(a) is amended to read: 26 (a) If a candidate does not appear on the primary election ballot or is not 27 successful in advancing to the general election and wishes to be a candidate in the 28 general election, the candidate may file as a write-in candidate. Votes for a write-in 29 candidate may not be counted unless that candidate has filed a letter of intent with the 30 director stating 31 (1) the full name of the candidate; 01 (2) the full residence address of the candidate and the date on which 02 residency at that address began; 03 (3) the full mailing address of the candidate; 04 (4) the name of the political party or political group of which the 05 candidate is a member, if any [WITH WHICH THE CANDIDATE IS 06 REGISTERED AS AFFILIATED, OR WHETHER THE CANDIDATE WOULD 07 PREFER A NONPARTISAN OR UNDECLARED DESIGNATION]; 08 (5) if the candidate is for the office of state senator or state 09 representative, the house or senate district of which the candidate is a resident; 10 (6) the office that the candidate seeks; 11 (7) the date of the election at which the candidate seeks election; 12 (8) the length of residency in the state and in the house district of the 13 candidate; 14 (9) the name of the candidate as the candidate wishes it to be written 15 on the ballot by the voter; 16 (10) that the candidate meets the specific citizenship requirements of 17 the office for which the person is a candidate; 18 (11) that the candidate will meet the specific age requirements of the 19 office for which the person is a candidate; if the candidacy is for the office of state 20 representative, that the candidate will be at least 21 years of age on the first scheduled 21 day of the first regular session of the legislature convened after the election; if the 22 candidacy is for the office of state senator, that the candidate will be at least 25 years 23 of age on the first scheduled day of the first regular session of the legislature convened 24 after the election; if the candidacy is for the office of governor or lieutenant governor, 25 that the candidate will be at least 30 years of age on the first Monday in December 26 following election or, if the office is to be filled by special election under 27 AS 15.40.230 - 15.40.310, that the candidate will be at least 30 years of age on the 28 date of certification of the results of the special election; or, for any other office, by 29 the time that the candidate, if elected, is sworn into office; 30 (12) that the candidate is a qualified voter as required by law; and 31 (13) that the candidate is not a candidate for any other office to be 01 voted on at the general election and that the candidate is not a candidate for this office 02 under any other nominating petition or declaration of candidacy. 03 * Sec. 29. AS 15.25.105(b) is amended to read: 04 (b) If a write-in candidate is running for the office of governor, the candidate 05 must file a joint letter of intent together with a candidate for lieutenant governor. Both 06 candidates must be of the same political party or group. 07 * Sec. 30. AS 15.25 is amended by adding new sections to article 1 to read: 08 Sec. 15.25.111. Filling vacancies by party petition. If a candidate of a 09 political party nominated at the primary election dies, withdraws, resigns, becomes 10 disqualified from holding the office for which the candidate is nominated, or is 11 certified as being incapacitated in the manner prescribed by this section after the 12 primary election and 64 days or more before the general election, the vacancy may be 13 filled by party petition. The central committee of any political party or any party 14 district committee may certify as being incapacitated any candidate nominated by their 15 respective party by presenting to the director a sworn statement made by a panel of 16 three licensed physicians, not more than two of whom may be of the same political 17 party, that the candidate is physically or mentally incapacitated to an extent that 18 would, in the panel's judgment, prevent the candidate from active service during the 19 term of office if elected. The director shall place the name of the person nominated by 20 party petition on the general election ballot. The name of a candidate disqualified 21 under this section may not appear on the general election ballot. 22 Sec. 15.25.121. Requirements for party petition. Party petitions for the 23 nomination of candidates shall state in substance that the political party desires and 24 intends to support the named candidate for the named office and requests that the 25 name of the proposed candidate be placed on the general election ballot. The petition 26 may be filed not later than 64 days before the date of the general election. 27 Sec. 15.25.131. Selection of nominees for party petition. The nominees of 28 political parties by party petition may be selected for statewide offices by the state 29 party central committee or in any other manner prescribed by the party bylaws, and the 30 petition for statewide offices shall be signed by the state chairperson of the political 31 party or, in the absence of the state chairperson, by any two members of the state party 01 central committee. The nominees of political parties by party petition may be selected 02 for district-wide offices by the respective party district committee or in any other 03 manner prescribed by the party bylaws, and the petition for district-wide offices shall 04 be signed by the chairperson of the party district committee, or in the absence of the 05 chairperson, by any two members of the party district committee, or in any other 06 manner prescribed by the party bylaws. The petition may be delivered in person or by 07 mail, facsimile, or other reliable electronic transmission. 08 * Sec. 31. AS 15.25 is amended by adding new sections to article 2 to read: 09 Sec. 15.25.141. Provision for no-party candidate nominations. Candidates 10 not representing a political party are nominated by petition. 11 Sec. 15.25.151. Date of filing petition. A candidate seeking nomination by 12 petition shall submit the information required under AS 15.25.181(a)(1) - (8) and (11) 13 - (17) to the director in the time and manner specified in AS 15.25.040. The full 14 petition with voter signatures shall be filed with the director by actual physical 15 delivery in person at or before 5:00 p.m., prevailing time, on the day of the primary 16 election in the year in which a general election is held for the office, or by actual 17 physical delivery to the director by registered or certified mail return receipt requested 18 which is postmarked at or before 5:00 p.m., prevailing time, on the day of the primary 19 election in the year in which a general election is held for the office, and received not 20 more than 15 days after that time. If the postmark is illegible, a dated receipt from the 21 post office where dispatched shall be acceptable as evidence of mailing. 22 Sec. 15.25.161. Required number of signatures for statewide office. 23 Petitions for the nomination of candidates for the office of governor, lieutenant 24 governor, United States senator, and United States representative shall be signed by 25 qualified voters of the state equal in number to at least one percent of the number of 26 voters who cast ballots in the preceding general election. 27 Sec. 15.25.171. Required number of signatures for district-wide office. 28 Petitions for the nomination of candidates for the office of state senator or state 29 representative shall be signed by qualified voters of the house or senate district in 30 which the proposed nominee desires to be a candidate equal in number to at least one 31 percent of the number of voters who cast ballots in the proposed nominee's respective 01 house or senate district in the preceding general election. A nominating petition may 02 not contain less than 50 signatures for any district. 03 Sec. 15.25.181. Requirements for petition. (a) The petition must state in 04 substance 05 (1) the full name of the candidate; 06 (2) the full residence address of the candidate and the date on which 07 residency at that address began; 08 (3) the full mailing address of the candidate; 09 (4) the name of the political group, if any, supporting the candidate; 10 (5) if the candidacy is for the office of state senator or state 11 representative, the house or senate district of which the candidate is a resident; 12 (6) the office for which the candidate is nominated; 13 (7) the date of the election at which the candidate seeks election; 14 (8) the length of residency in the state and in the district of the 15 candidate; 16 (9) that the subscribers are qualified voters of the state or house or 17 senate district in which the candidate resides; 18 (10) that the subscribers request that the candidate's name be placed on 19 the general election ballot; 20 (11) that the proposed candidate accepts the nomination and will serve 21 if elected with the statement signed by the proposed candidate; 22 (12) the name of the candidate as the candidate wishes it to appear on 23 the ballot; 24 (13) that the candidate is not a candidate for any other office to be 25 voted on at the primary or general election and that the candidate is not a candidate for 26 this office under any other nominating petition or declaration of candidacy; 27 (14) that the candidate meets the specific citizenship requirements of 28 the office for which the person is a candidate; 29 (15) that the candidate will meet the specific age requirements of the 30 office for which the person is a candidate; if the candidacy is for the office of state 31 representative, that the candidate will be at least 21 years of age on the first scheduled 01 day of the first regular session of the legislature convened after the election; if the 02 candidacy is for the office of state senator, that the candidate will be at least 25 years 03 of age on the first scheduled day of the first regular session of the legislature convened 04 after the election; and if the candidacy is for the office of governor or lieutenant 05 governor, that the candidate will be at least 30 years of age on the first Monday in 06 December following the election or, if the office is to be filled by special election 07 under AS 15.40.230 - 15.40.310, that the candidate will be at least 30 years of age on 08 the date of certification of the results of the special election; or, for any other office, 09 by the time that the candidate, if elected, is sworn into office; 10 (16) that the candidate is a qualified voter; and 11 (17) if the candidacy is for the office of the governor, the name of the 12 candidate for lieutenant governor running jointly with the candidate for governor. 13 (b) A person filing a nominating petition under this section, other than a 14 person subject to AS 24.60 who is filing a petition for a state legislative office, shall 15 simultaneously file with the director a statement of income sources and business 16 interests that complies with the requirements of AS 39.50. A person who is subject to 17 AS 24.60 and is filing a nominating petition for state legislative office shall 18 simultaneously file with the director a disclosure statement that complies with the 19 requirements of AS 24.60.200. 20 (c) An incumbent public official, other than a legislator, who has a current 21 statement of income sources and business interests under AS 39.50 on file with the 22 Alaska Public Offices Commission, or an incumbent legislator who has a current 23 disclosure statement under AS 24.60.200 on file with the Alaska Public Offices 24 Commission, is not required to file a statement of income sources and business 25 interests or a disclosure statement with the nominating petition under (b) of this 26 section. 27 Sec. 15.25.186. Eligibility of candidate. The provisions of AS 15.25.042 and 28 15.25.043 apply to determinations of a candidate's eligibility when a candidate seeks 29 nomination by petition under AS 15.25.141 - 15.25.201. 30 Sec. 15.25.191. Placement of names on general election ballot. The director 31 shall place the names and the political group affiliation of persons who have been 01 properly nominated by petition on the general election ballot. 02 Sec. 15.25.201. Withdrawal of candidate's name. If a candidate nominated 03 by petition dies or withdraws after the petition has been filed and 64 days or more 04 before the general election, the director may not place the name of the candidate on 05 the general election ballot. 06 * Sec. 32. AS 15.30.010 is amended to read: 07 Sec. 15.30.010. Provision for selection of electors. Electors of President and 08 Vice President of the United States are selected by election at the general election in 09 presidential election years [, IN THE MANNER AND AS DETERMINED BY THE 10 RANKED-CHOICE METHOD OF TABULATING VOTES DESCRIBED IN 11 AS 15.15.350 - 15.15.370]. 12 * Sec. 33. AS 15.40.140 is amended to read: 13 Sec. 15.40.140. Condition of calling [SPECIAL PRIMARY ELECTION 14 AND] special election. When a vacancy occurs in the office of United States senator 15 or United States representative, the governor shall, by proclamation, call a special 16 [PRIMARY] election under AS 15.40.144(a); however, [TO BE HELD ON A DATE 17 NOT LESS THAN 60, NOR MORE THAN 90, DAYS AFTER THE DATE THE 18 VACANCY OCCURS, TO BE FOLLOWED BY A SPECIAL ELECTION ON THE 19 FIRST TUESDAY THAT IS NOT A STATE HOLIDAY OCCURRING NOT LESS 20 THAN 60 DAYS AFTER THE SPECIAL PRIMARY ELECTION. HOWEVER, IN 21 AN ELECTION YEAR IN WHICH A CANDIDATE FOR THAT OFFICE IS NOT 22 REGULARLY ELECTED,] if the vacancy occurs on a date that is [NOT] less than 60 23 days [, NOR MORE THAN 90,] before or is on or after the date of 24 [(1)] the primary election in the general election year during which 25 a candidate to fill the office is regularly elected, the governor may not call a [, 26 THE] special [PRIMARY] election [SHALL BE HELD ON THE DATE OF THE 27 PRIMARY ELECTION WITH THE SUBSEQUENT SPECIAL ELECTION TO BE 28 HELD ON THE DATE OF THE GENERAL ELECTION; OR 29 (2) THE GENERAL ELECTION, THE SPECIAL PRIMARY 30 ELECTION SHALL BE HELD ON THE DATE OF THE GENERAL ELECTION 31 WITH THE SUBSEQUENT SPECIAL ELECTION TO BE HELD ON THE FIRST 01 TUESDAY THAT IS NOT A STATE HOLIDAY OCCURRING NOT LESS THAN 02 60 DAYS AFTER THE SPECIAL PRIMARY AND GENERAL ELECTION]. 03 * Sec. 34. AS 15.40 is amended by adding new sections to read: 04 Sec. 15.40.143. Condition of calling a special runoff election. (a) If no 05 candidate in a special election called under AS 15.40.140 receives over 50 percent of 06 the votes cast for the office, the governor shall, by proclamation, call a special runoff 07 election under AS 15.40.144(b). 08 (b) In a special runoff election called under (a) of this section, the director 09 shall place the names of the candidates receiving the greatest number of votes and the 10 second greatest number of votes in the special election on the special runoff election 11 ballot. 12 Sec. 15.40.144. Time of calling the special election and special runoff 13 election. (a) Except as provided in (c) of this section, if a special election is called 14 under AS 15.40.140, it shall be held on a date not less than 60, nor more than 90, days 15 after the date the vacancy occurs. 16 (b) Except as provided in (c) of this section, a special runoff election under 17 AS 15.40.143 shall be held on the first Tuesday that is not a state holiday occurring 18 not less than 60 days after the special election. 19 (c) In an election year in which a candidate for the vacant office is not 20 regularly elected, and the vacancy occurs on a date that is not less than 60, nor more 21 than 90, days before the date of 22 (1) the primary election, the special election shall be held on the date 23 of the primary election with any subsequent special runoff election under 24 AS 15.40.143 to be held on the date of the general election; or 25 (2) the general election, the special election shall be held on the date of 26 the general election with any subsequent special runoff election under AS 15.40.143 to 27 be held on the first Tuesday that is not a state holiday occurring not less than 60 days 28 after the special and general election. 29 * Sec. 35. AS 15.40 is amended by adding a new section to read: 30 Sec. 15.40.151. Condition for holding special election with primary. If the 31 vacancy occurs on a date not less than 60, nor more than 90, days before the date of 01 the primary election, the governor shall, by proclamation, call the special election to 02 be held on the date of the primary election. 03 * Sec. 36. AS 15.40.160 is amended to read: 04 Sec. 15.40.160. Proclamation. The governor shall issue the proclamation 05 [CALLING THE SPECIAL PRIMARY ELECTION AND SPECIAL ELECTION] at 06 least 50 days before the 07 (1) special [PRIMARY] election; and 08 (2) if a special runoff election is required under AS 15.40.143(a), 09 special runoff election. 10 * Sec. 37. AS 15.40.165 is amended to read: 11 Sec. 15.40.165. Term of elected senator. At the special election, or, as 12 provided by AS 15.40.143, at the special runoff election, a United States senator 13 shall be elected to fill the remainder of the unexpired term. The person elected shall 14 take office on the date the United States Senate meets, convenes, or reconvenes 15 following the certification of the results of the special election or special runoff 16 election by the director. 17 * Sec. 38. AS 15.40.170 is amended to read: 18 Sec. 15.40.170. Term of elected representative. At the special election, or, as 19 provided by AS 15.40.143, at the special runoff election, a United States 20 representative shall be elected to fill the remainder of the unexpired term. The person 21 elected shall take office on the date the United States house of representatives meets, 22 convenes, or reconvenes following the certification of the results of the special 23 election or special runoff election by the director. 24 * Sec. 39. AS 15.40.190 is amended to read: 25 Sec. 15.40.190. Requirements of petition for no-party candidates. Petitions 26 for the nomination of candidates not representing a political party shall be signed 27 by qualified voters of the state equal in number to at least one percent of the 28 number of voters who cast ballots in the preceding general election and shall 29 [MUST BE EXECUTED UNDER OATH,] state in substance that which is required 30 for nomination petitions by AS 15.25.181 [A DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY 31 UNDER AS 15.25.030, AND INCLUDE THE FEE REQUIRED UNDER 01 AS 15.25.050(a)]. 02 * Sec. 40. AS 15.40 is amended by adding new sections to read: 03 Sec. 15.40.201. Requirements of party petition. Petitions for the nomination 04 of candidates of political parties shall state in substance that the party desires and 05 intends to support the named candidate for the office of United States senator or 06 United States representative, as appropriate, at the special election and requests that 07 the name of the candidate nominated be placed on the ballot. 08 Sec. 15.40.211. Selection of party nominees. The nominees of political 09 parties may be selected by the state convention or in any other manner prescribed by 10 the party bylaws, and the petition shall be signed by the chairperson and secretary of 11 the state convention, or if the nominees are selected by the party central committee, 12 the petition shall be signed by the chairperson of the central committee or in any other 13 manner prescribed by the party bylaws. 14 * Sec. 41. AS 15.40.220 is amended to read: 15 Sec. 15.40.220. General provisions for conduct of [THE] special 16 [PRIMARY] election and special runoff election. Unless specifically provided 17 otherwise, all provisions regarding the conduct of the [PRIMARY ELECTION AND] 18 general election shall govern the conduct of the special [PRIMARY] election and the 19 special runoff election of the United States senator or United States representative, 20 including provisions concerning voter qualifications; provisions regarding the duties, 21 powers, rights, and obligations of the director, of other election officials, and of 22 municipalities; provision for notification of the election; provision for payment of 23 election expenses; provisions regarding employees being allowed time from work to 24 vote; provisions for the counting, reviewing, and certification of returns; provisions 25 for running as, voting for, and counting ballots for a write-in candidate; 26 provisions for the determination of the votes and of recounts, contests, and appeal; and 27 provision for absentee voting. 28 * Sec. 42. AS 15.40.230 is amended to read: 29 Sec. 15.40.230. Condition and time of calling [SPECIAL PRIMARY 30 ELECTION AND] special election. When a person appointed to succeed to the 31 office of lieutenant governor succeeds to the office of acting governor, the acting 01 governor shall, by proclamation, call a special [PRIMARY] election to be held on a 02 date not less than 60, nor more than 90, days after the date the vacancy in the office of 03 the governor occurred [AND A SUBSEQUENT SPECIAL ELECTION TO BE HELD 04 ON THE FIRST TUESDAY THAT IS NOT A STATE HOLIDAY OCCURRING 05 NOT LESS THAN 60 DAYS AFTER THE SPECIAL PRIMARY ELECTION]. 06 However, if the vacancy occurs on a date that is less than 60 days before or is on or 07 after the date of the primary election in years in which a governor is regularly elected, 08 the acting governor shall serve the remainder of the unexpired term and may not call a 09 special election. 10 * Sec. 43. AS 15.40.240 is amended to read: 11 Sec. 15.40.240. Conditions for holding special [PRIMARY ELECTION 12 AND SPECIAL] election with primary or general election. If the vacancy occurs 13 on a date not less than 60, nor more than 90, days before the date of the primary 14 election in years in which a governor is regularly elected [IN AN ELECTION 15 YEAR IN WHICH A GOVERNOR IS NOT REGULARLY ELECTED, THE 16 ACTING GOVERNOR SHALL, BY PROCLAMATION, CALL THE SPECIAL 17 PRIMARY ELECTION TO BE HELD ON THE DATE OF THE PRIMARY 18 ELECTION AND THE SPECIAL ELECTION TO BE HELD ON THE DATE OF 19 THE GENERAL ELECTION,] or [,] if the vacancy occurs on a date not less than 60, 20 nor more than 90, days before the date of the primary election or general election in 21 election years in which a governor is not regularly elected, the acting governor shall, 22 by proclamation, call the special [PRIMARY] election to be held on the date of the 23 primary election or general election [WITH THE SUBSEQUENT SPECIAL 24 ELECTION TO BE HELD ON THE FIRST TUESDAY THAT IS NOT A STATE 25 HOLIDAY OCCURRING NOT LESS THAN 60 DAYS AFTER THE SPECIAL 26 PRIMARY AND GENERAL ELECTION]. 27 * Sec. 44. AS 15.40.250 is amended to read: 28 Sec. 15.40.250. Proclamation of [SPECIAL PRIMARY ELECTION AND] 29 special election. The acting governor shall issue the proclamation [CALLING THE 30 SPECIAL PRIMARY ELECTION AND SPECIAL ELECTION] at least 50 days 31 before the [SPECIAL PRIMARY] election. 01 * Sec. 45. AS 15.40.280 is amended to read: 02 Sec. 15.40.280. Requirements of petition for no-party candidates. Petitions 03 for the nomination of candidates not representing a political party shall be signed 04 by qualified voters of the state equal in number to at least one percent of the 05 number of voters who cast ballots in the preceding general election, shall include 06 nominees for the office of governor and lieutenant governor, and shall [MUST BE 07 EXECUTED UNDER OATH,] state in substance that which is required for 08 nomination petitions by AS 15.25.181 [A DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY 09 UNDER AS 15.25.030, AND INCLUDE THE FEE REQUIRED UNDER 10 AS 15.25.050(a).] 11 * Sec. 46. AS 15.40 is amended by adding new sections to read: 12 Sec. 15.40.291. Requirements of party petition. Petitions for the nomination 13 of candidates of political parties shall state in substance that the party desires and 14 intends to support the named candidates for the offices of governor and lieutenant 15 governor at the special election and requests that the names of the two candidates 16 nominated be placed on the ballot. 17 Sec. 15.40.301. Selection of party nominees. The nominees of political 18 parties may be selected by state convention or in any other manner prescribed by the 19 party bylaws, and the petition shall be signed by the chairperson and secretary of the 20 state convention, or, if the nominees are selected by the party central committee, the 21 petition shall be signed by the state chairperson of the political party or in any other 22 manner prescribed by the party bylaws. 23 * Sec. 47. AS 15.40.310 is amended to read: 24 Sec. 15.40.310. General provisions for conduct of [THE SPECIAL 25 PRIMARY ELECTION AND] special election. Unless specifically provided 26 otherwise, all provisions regarding the conduct of the [PRIMARY AND] general 27 election shall govern the conduct of the special [PRIMARY ELECTION AND 28 SPECIAL] election of the governor and lieutenant governor, including provisions 29 concerning voter qualifications; provisions regarding the duties, powers, rights, and 30 obligations of the director, of other election officials, and of municipalities; provision 31 for notification of the election; provision for payment of election expenses; provisions 01 regarding employees being allowed time from work to vote; provisions for the 02 counting, reviewing, and certification of returns; provisions for the determination of 03 the votes and of recounts, contests, and appeal; and provision for absentee voting. 04 * Sec. 48. AS 15.40.330 is amended to read: 05 Sec. 15.40.330. Qualification and confirmation of appointee. (a) The 06 appointee shall meet the qualifications of a member of the legislature as prescribed in 07 art. II, sec. 2, Constitution of the State of Alaska, [AND, IF THE PREDECESSOR IN 08 OFFICE WAS A MEMBER OF A POLITICAL PARTY OR POLITICAL GROUP 09 AT THE TIME OF THE VACANCY, (1)] shall be a member of the same political 10 party [OR POLITICAL GROUP] as that which nominated the predecessor in office, 11 [;] and [(2)] shall be subject to confirmation by a majority of the members of the 12 legislature who are members of the same political party which nominated [OR 13 POLITICAL GROUP AS] the predecessor in office and of the same house as was the 14 predecessor in office. If the predecessor in office was not nominated by [A 15 MEMBER OF] a political party or [POLITICAL GROUP AT THE TIME OF THE 16 VACANCY, OR,] if no other member of the predecessor's political party [OR 17 POLITICAL GROUP] is a member of the predecessor's house of the legislature, the 18 governor may appoint any qualified person. If the appointee is not a member of a 19 political party [OR POLITICAL GROUP, AS PROVIDED IN (b) OF THIS 20 SECTION], the appointment is not subject to confirmation. If the appointee is a 21 member of a political party [OR POLITICAL GROUP], the appointment is subject to 22 confirmation as provided by [(b) OF] this section for the confirmation of political 23 party [OR POLITICAL GROUP] appointees. 24 (b) A member of a political party [OR POLITICAL GROUP] is a person who 25 supports the political program of a [POLITICAL] party [OR POLITICAL GROUP]. 26 The filing for office of a candidate as an independent or no-party candidate 27 [ABSENCE OF A POLITICAL PARTY OR POLITICAL GROUP DESIGNATION 28 AFTER A CANDIDATE'S NAME ON AN ELECTION BALLOT] does not preclude 29 a candidate from being a member of a political party [OR POLITICAL GROUP]. 30 Recognition of an independent or no-party [A] candidate as a member of a 31 [POLITICAL] party [OR POLITICAL GROUP] caucus of members of the legislature 01 at the legislative session following the election of the independent or no-party 02 candidate is recognition of that person's [POLITICAL] party [OR POLITICAL 03 GROUP] membership at the time filings were made by party candidates for the 04 preceding general election [FOR THE PURPOSES OF CONFIRMATION UNDER 05 THIS SECTION]. 06 * Sec. 49. AS 15.40.380 is amended to read: 07 Sec. 15.40.380. Conditions for part-term senate appointment and special 08 election. If the vacancy is for an unexpired senate term of more than two years and 09 five full calendar months, the governor shall call a special [PRIMARY ELECTION 10 AND A SPECIAL] election by proclamation and the appointment shall expire on the 11 date the state senate first convenes or reconvenes following the certification of the 12 results of the special election by the director. 13 * Sec. 50. AS 15.40.390 is amended to read: 14 Sec. 15.40.390. Date of special [PRIMARY ELECTION AND SPECIAL] 15 election. The special [PRIMARY] election to fill a vacancy in the state senate shall be 16 held on the date of the first general [PRIMARY] election held more than three full 17 calendar months [60 DAYS] after the senate vacancy occurs [, AND THE SPECIAL 18 ELECTION SHALL BE HELD ON THE DATE OF THE FIRST GENERAL 19 ELECTION THEREAFTER]. 20 * Sec. 51. AS 15.40.400 is amended to read: 21 Sec. 15.40.400. Proclamation of [SPECIAL PRIMARY ELECTION AND] 22 special election. The governor shall issue the proclamation calling the [SPECIAL 23 PRIMARY ELECTION AND] special election at least 50 days before the [SPECIAL 24 PRIMARY] election. 25 * Sec. 52. AS 15.40.440 is amended to read: 26 Sec. 15.40.440. Requirements of petition for no-party candidates. Petitions 27 for the nomination of candidates not representing a political party shall be signed 28 by qualified voters equal in number to at least one percent of the number of 29 voters who cast ballots in the proposed nominee's respective house or senate 30 district in the preceding general election. A nominating petition may not contain 31 less than 50 signatures for any district and must [BE EXECUTED UNDER 01 OATH,] state in substance that which is required in petitions for nomination by 02 AS 15.25.181 [A DECLARATION OF CANDIDACY UNDER AS 15.25.030, AND 03 INCLUDE THE FEE REQUIRED UNDER AS 15.25.050(a)]. 04 * Sec. 53. AS 15.40 is amended by adding new sections to read: 05 Sec. 15.40.451. Requirements of petition by political party. Petitions for the 06 nomination of candidates of political parties shall state in substance that the party 07 desires and intends to support the named candidate for the office of state senator at the 08 special election and requests that the name of the candidate be placed on the ballot. 09 Sec. 15.40.461. Selection of political party nominees. The nominees of 10 political parties may be selected by the respective party district committee or by any 11 other manner as provided by the party bylaws, and the petition shall be signed by the 12 chairperson of the party district committee or by any other party official designated by 13 the party bylaws. 14 * Sec. 54. AS 15.40.470 is amended to read: 15 Sec. 15.40.470. General provision for conduct of [THE SPECIAL 16 PRIMARY ELECTION AND] special election. Unless specifically provided 17 otherwise, all provisions regarding the conduct of the [PRIMARY ELECTION AND] 18 general election shall govern the conduct of the special [PRIMARY ELECTION AND 19 SPECIAL] election of state senators, including provisions concerning voter 20 qualifications; provisions regarding the duties, powers, rights, and obligations of the 21 director, of other election officials, and of municipalities; provision for notification of 22 the election; provision for payment of election expenses; provisions regarding 23 employees being allowed time from work to vote; provisions for the counting, 24 reviewing, and certification of returns; provisions for the determination of the votes 25 and of recounts, contests, and appeal; and provision for absentee voting. 26 * Sec. 55. AS 15.45.190 is amended to read: 27 Sec. 15.45.190. Placing proposition on ballot. The lieutenant governor shall 28 direct the director to place the ballot title and proposition on the election ballot of the 29 first statewide general, special, special runoff [PRIMARY], or primary election that is 30 held after 31 (1) the petition has been filed; 01 (2) a legislative session has convened and adjourned; and 02 (3) a period of 120 days has expired since the adjournment of the 03 legislative session. 04 * Sec. 56. AS 15.45.420 is amended to read: 05 Sec. 15.45.420. Placing proposition on ballot. The lieutenant governor shall 06 direct the director to place the ballot title and proposition on the election ballot for the 07 first statewide general, special, special runoff [PRIMARY], or primary election held 08 more than 180 days after adjournment of the legislative session at which the act was 09 passed. 10 * Sec. 57. AS 15.58.010 is amended to read: 11 Sec. 15.58.010. Election pamphlet. Before each state general election, and 12 before each state primary, special, or special runoff [PRIMARY] election at which a 13 ballot proposition is scheduled to appear on the ballot, the lieutenant governor shall 14 prepare, publish, and mail at least one election pamphlet to each household identified 15 from the official registration list. The pamphlet shall be prepared on a regional basis as 16 determined by the lieutenant governor. 17 * Sec. 58. AS 15.58.020(b) is amended to read: 18 (b) Each primary, special, or special runoff [PRIMARY] election pamphlet 19 shall contain only the information specified in (a)(6) and (a)(9) of this section for each 20 ballot measure scheduled to appear on the primary, special, or special runoff 21 [PRIMARY] election ballot. 22 * Sec. 59. AS 15.58.030(b) is amended to read: 23 (b) Not later than July 22 of a year in which a state general election will be 24 held, an individual who becomes a candidate for the office of United States senator, 25 United States representative, governor, lieutenant governor, state senator, or state 26 representative under AS 15.25.030 or 15.25.181 may file with the lieutenant governor 27 a photograph and a statement advocating the candidacy. An individual who becomes 28 a candidate for the office of United States senator, United States representative, 29 governor, lieutenant governor, state senator, or state representative by party 30 petition filed under AS 15.25.111 may file with the lieutenant governor a 31 photograph and a statement advocating the candidacy within 10 days of 01 becoming a candidate. 02 * Sec. 60. AS 15.80.010(9) is amended to read: 03 (9) "federal election" means a general, special, special runoff 04 [PRIMARY], or primary election held solely or in part for the purpose of selecting, 05 nominating, or electing a candidate for the office of President, Vice-President, 06 presidential elector, United States senator, or United States representative; 07 * Sec. 61. AS 39.50.020(b) is amended to read: 08 (b) A public official or former public official other than an elected or 09 appointed municipal officer shall file the statement with the Alaska Public Offices 10 Commission. Candidates for the office of governor and lieutenant governor and, if the 11 candidate is not subject to AS 24.60, the legislature shall file the statement under 12 AS 15.25.030 or 15.25.181. Municipal officers, former municipal officers, and 13 candidates for elective municipal office shall file with the municipal clerk or other 14 municipal official designated to receive their filing for office. All statements required 15 to be filed under this chapter are public records. 16 * Sec. 62. AS 15.15.025, 15.15.030(14), 15.15.030(15), 15.15.030(16), 15.15.030(17), 17 15.15.060(e), 15.15.350(c), 15.15.350(d), 15.15.350(e), 15.15.350(f), 15.15.350(g); 18 AS 15.58.020(a)(13), 15.58.020(c); AS 15.80.008(a)(2), and 15.80.010(34) are repealed. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.